Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.270

List of statutes and regulations of each state that grants preference to in-state vendors.

The director shall compile a list of the statutes and regulations, relating to state purchasing, of each state, which statutes and regulations the director believes grant a preference to vendors located within the state or goods manufactured within the state. At least once every twelve months the director shall update the list.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 240; 1983 c 183 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.19.702.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.